Utah statutes.
64-13a-9.   Expenses to be paid from fund.

All expenditures necessary for the administration of this chapter, including the payment of all salaries, necessary overhead expenses, acquisition of assets, and raw materials shall be paid by warrants of the state drawn on the state treasurer to be paid out of the Utah Correctional Industries Fund.

